Maryland, session 2025, HB1123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
7–305.
Each hearing examiner and commissioner determining whether an incarcerated
individual is suitable for parole, and the Commission before entering into a predetermined
parole release agreement, shall consider:
(1) the circumstances surrounding the crime;
(2) the physical, mental, and moral qualifications of the incarcerated
individual;
(3) the progress of the incarcerated individual during confinement,
including the academic progress of the incarcerated individual in the mandatory education
program required under § 22–102 of the Education Article;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 103
(4) a report on a drug or alcohol evaluation that has been conducted on the
incarcerated individual, including any recommendations concerning the incarcerated
individual’s amenability for treatment and the availability of an appropriate treatment
program;
(5) whether, TAKING INTO ACCOUNT THE TOTALITY OF THE
CIRCUMSTANCES INCLUDING THE AGE OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL, there is
reasonable probability that the incarcerated individual, if released on parole, will [remain
at liberty without violating the law] NOT RECIDIVATE;
(6) whether release of the incarcerated individual on parole is compatible
with [the welfare of society] PUBLIC SAFETY;
(7) an updated victim impact statement or recommendation prepared under
§ 7–801 of this title;
(8) any recommendation made by the sentencing judge at the time of
sentencing;
(9) any information that is presented to a commissioner at a meeting with
the victim;
(10) any testimony presented to the Commission by the victim or the victim’s
designated representative under § 7–801 of this title; and
(11) compliance with the case plan developed under § 7–301.1 of this subtitle
or § 3–601 of this article.
7–309.
(a) This section applies to any incarcerated individual who is sentenced to a term
of incarceration for which all sentences being served, including any life sentence, are with
the possibility of parole.
(b) An incarcerated individual who is so chronically debilitated or incapacitated
by a medical or mental health condition, disease, or syndrome as to be physically incapable
of presenting a danger to society may be released on medical parole at any time during the
term of that incarcerated individual’s sentence, without regard to the eligibility standards
specified in § 7–301 of this subtitle.
(c) (1) A request for a medical parole under this section may be filed with the
Maryland Parole Commission by:
(i) the incarcerated individual seeking the medical parole;
– 3 –

Ch. 103 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) an attorney;
(iii) a prison official or employee;
(iv) a medical professional;
(v) a family member; or
(vi) any other person.
(2) The request shall be in writing and shall articulate the grounds that
support the appropriateness of granting the medical parole.
(d) Following review of the request, the Commission may:
(1) find the request to be inconsistent with the best interests of public
safety and take no further action; or
(2) request that department or local correctional facility personnel provide
information for formal consideration of parole release.
(e) The information to be considered by the Commission before granting medical
parole shall, at a minimum, include:
(1) (i) a recommendation by the medical professional treating the
incarcerated individual under contract with the Department or local correctional facility;
or
(ii) if requested by an individual identified in subsection (c)(1) of this
section, one medical evaluation conducted at no cost to the incarcerated individual by a
medical professional who is independent from the Division of Correction or local
correctional facility;
(2) the incarcerated individual’s medical information, including:
(i) a description of the incarcerated individual’s condition, disease,
or syndrome;
(ii) a prognosis concerning the likelihood of recovery from the
condition, disease, or syndrome;
(iii) a description of the incarcerated individual’s physical incapacity
and score on the Karnofsky Performance Scale Index or similar classification of physical
impairment; and
(iv) a mental health evaluation, where relevant;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 103
(3) discharge information, including:
(i) availability of treatment or professional services within the
community;
(ii) family support within the community; and
(iii) housing availability, including hospital or hospice care; and
(4) case management information, including:
(i) the circumstances of the current offense;
(ii) institutional history;
(iii) pending charges, sentences in other jurisdictions, and any other
detainers; and
(iv) criminal history information.
(f) The Commission may require as a condition of release on medical parole that:
(1) the parolee agree to placement for a definite or indefinite period of time
in a hospital or hospice or other housing accommodation suitable to the parolee’s medical
condition, including the family home of the parolee, as specified by the Commission or the
supervising agent; and
(2) the parolee forward authentic copies of applicable medical records to
indicate that the particular medical condition giving rise to the release continues to exist.
(g) (1) If the Commission has reason to believe that a parolee is no longer so
debilitated or incapacitated as to be physically incapable of presenting a danger to society,
the parolee shall be returned to the custody of the Division of Correction or the local
correctional facility from which the incarcerated individual was released.
(2) (i) A parole hearing for a parolee returned to custody shall be held
to consider whether the parolee remains incapacitated and shall be heard promptly.
(ii) A parolee returned to custody under this subsection shall be
maintained in custody, if the incapacitation is found to no longer exist.
(3) An incarcerated individual whose medical parole is revoked for lack of
continued incapacitation may be considered for parole in accordance with the eligibility
requirements specified in § 7–301 of this subtitle.
– 5 –

Ch. 103 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(h) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, provisions of law relating to
victim notification and opportunity to be heard shall apply to proceedings relating to
medical parole.
(2) In cases of imminent death, time limits relating to victim notification
and opportunity to be heard may be reduced or waived in the discretion of the Commission.
(i) [(1) If the Commission decides to grant medical parole to an incarcerated
individual sentenced to life imprisonment, the decision shall be transmitted to the
Governor.
(2) The Governor may disapprove the decision by written transmittal to
the Commission.
(3) If the Governor does not disapprove the decision within 180 days after
receipt of the written transmittal, the decision becomes effective.
(j)] The Commission shall issue regulations to implement the provisions of this
section.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “CHRONICALLY DEBILITATED OR INCAPACITATED” MEANS
HAVING A DIAGNOSABLE MEDICAL CONDITION THAT IS UNLIKELY TO IMPROVE IN
THE FUTURE AND SUBSTANTIALLY DIMINISHES THE ABILITY OF THE INDIVIDUAL TO
PROVIDE SELF–CARE.
(II) “CHRONICALLY DEBILITATED OR INCAPACITATED”
INCLUDES CONDITIONS SUCH AS DEMENTIA OR A SEVERE, PERMANENT MEDICAL OR
COGNITIVE DISABILITY IF THE CONDITION SUBSTANTIALLY DIMINISHES THE
ABILITY OF THE INDIVIDUAL TO PROVIDE SELF–CARE.
(3) “TERMINAL ILLNESS” MEANS A DISEASE OR CONDITION WITH AN
END–OF–LIFE TRAJECTORY.
(B) This section applies to any incarcerated individual who is sentenced to a term
of incarceration for which all sentences being served, including any life sentence, are with
the possibility of parole.
[(b)] (C) An incarcerated individual [who is so chronically debilitated or
incapacitated by a medical or mental health condition, disease, or syndrome as to be
physically incapable of presenting a danger to society] may be released on medical parole
at any time during the term of that incarcerated individual’s sentence, without regard to
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 103
the eligibility standards specified in § 7–301 of this subtitle IF A LICENSED PHYSICIAN
HAS DETERMINED THAT THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL:
(1) (I) IS CHRONICALLY DEBILITATED OR INCAPACITATED; OR
(II) SUFFERS FROM A TERMINAL ILLNESS; AND
(2) (I) REQUIRES EXTENDED MEDICAL MANAGEMENT WITH
HEALTH CARE NEEDS THAT WOULD BE BETTER MET BY COMMUNITY SERVICES; AND
(II) 1. HAS BEEN RENDERED PHYSICALLY INCAPABLE OF
PRESENTING A DANGER TO SOCIETY BY A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH
CONDITION, DISEASE, OR SYNDROME; OR
2. IS NO LONGER A DANGER TO PUBLIC SAFETY.
(D) (1) THE INFORMATION TO BE CONSIDERED BY THE COMMISSION
BEFORE GRANTING MEDICAL PAROLE SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE:
(I) 1. A RECOMMENDATION BY THE MEDICAL
PROFESSIONAL TREATING THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL UNDER CONTRACT
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY; OR
2. IF REQUESTED BY AN INDIVIDUAL IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION, ONE MEDICAL EVALUATION CONDUCTED AT
NO COST TO THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL BY A LICENSED PHYSICIAN WHO IS
INDEPENDENT FROM THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY;
(II) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S MEDICAL
INFORMATION, INCLUDING:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S CONDITION, DISEASE, OR SYNDROME;
2. A PROGNOSIS CONCERNING THE LIKELIHOOD OF
RECOVERY FROM THE CONDITION, DISEASE, OR SYNDROME;
3. A DESCRIPTION OF THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S PHYSICAL INCAPACITY; AND
4. A MENTAL HEALTH EVALUATION, WHERE RELEVANT;
(III) DISCHARGE INFORMATION, INCLUDING:
– 7 –

Ch. 103 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. AVAILABILITY OF TREATMENT OR PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES WITHIN THE COMMUNITY;
2. FAMILY SUPPORT WITHIN THE COMMUNITY; AND
3. HOUSING AVAILABILITY, INCLUDING HOSPITAL OR
HOSPICE CARE; AND
(IV) CASE MANAGEMENT INFORMATION, INCLUDING:
1. THE CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE CURRENT OFFENSE;
2. INSTITUTIONAL HISTORY;
3. PENDING CHARGES, SENTENCES IN OTHER
JURISDICTIONS, AND ANY OTHER DETAINERS; AND
4. CRIMINAL HISTORY INFORMATION.
(2) IF A MEDICAL EVALUATION IS REQUESTED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(I)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE EVALUATION SHALL CONSIST OF AN IN–PERSON
EXAMINATION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL GIVE EQUAL CONSIDERATION TO
THE FINDINGS OF THE EVALUATION AND ANY MEDICAL CONDITION DETAILED IN
THE EVALUATION IN CONSIDERING WHETHER TO GRANT MEDICAL PAROLE.
[(c)] (E) (1) A request for a medical parole under this section may be filed
with the Maryland Parole Commission by:
(i) the incarcerated individual seeking the medical parole;
(ii) an attorney;
(iii) a prison official or employee;
(iv) a medical professional;
(v) a family member; or
(vi) any other person.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 103
(2) The request shall be in writing and shall articulate the grounds that
support the appropriateness of granting the medical parole.
(F) (1) THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S REPRESENTATIVE MAY REQUEST A MEETING WITH THE COMMISSION.
(2) IF A REQUEST FOR A MEETING IS MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE COMMISSION SHALL GRANT THE REQUEST FOR A
MEETING FOR ANY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL:
1. HOUSED IN AN INFIRMARY OF A CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY;
2. CURRENTLY HOSPITALIZED OUTSIDE A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY; OR
3. WHO HAS BEEN FREQUENTLY HOUSED IN AN
INFIRMARY OF A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR HOSPITALIZED OUTSIDE A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY IN THE PRECEDING 6 MONTHS; AND
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY, AT ITS DISCRETION, GRANT THE
REQUEST FOR A MEETING FOR ANY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO DOES NOT
MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
[(d)] (G) Following review of the request, the Commission may:
(1) find the request to be inconsistent with the best interests of public
safety and take no further action; or
(2) request that [department] DEPARTMENT or local correctional facility
personnel provide information for formal consideration of parole release.
[(e) The information to be considered by the Commission before granting medical
parole shall, at a minimum, include:
(1) (i) a recommendation by the medical professional treating the
incarcerated individual under contract with the Department or local correctional facility;
or
(ii) if requested by an individual identified in subsection (c)(1) of this
section, one medical evaluation conducted at no cost to the incarcerated individual by a
– 9 –

Ch. 103 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
medical professional who is independent from the Division of Correction or local
correctional facility;
(2) the incarcerated individual’s medical information, including:
(i) a description of the incarcerated individual’s condition, disease,
or syndrome;
(ii) a prognosis concerning the likelihood of recovery from the
condition, disease, or syndrome;
(iii) a description of the incarcerated individual’s physical incapacity
and score on the Karnofsky Performance Scale Index or similar classification of physical
impairment; and
(iv) a mental health evaluation, where relevant;
(3) discharge information, including:
(i) availability of treatment or professional services within the
community;
(ii) family support within the community; and
(iii) housing availability, including hospital or hospice care; and
(4) case management information, including:
(i) the circumstances of the current offense;
(ii) institutional history;
(iii) pending charges, sentences in other jurisdictions, and any other
detainers; and
(iv) criminal history information.]
[(f)] (H) The Commission may require as a condition of release on medical parole
that:
(1) the parolee agree to placement for a definite or indefinite period of time
[in a hospital or hospice or other] UNDER THE CARE OF A MEDICAL PROVIDER AND IN
A housing accommodation suitable to the parolee’s medical condition, including the family
home of the parolee, as specified by the Commission or the supervising agent; and
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 103
(2) the parolee forward authentic copies of applicable medical records to
indicate that the particular medical condition giving rise to the release continues to exist.
[(g)] (I) (1) If the Commission has reason to believe that a parolee is no
longer so debilitated or incapacitated as to be physically incapable of presenting a danger
to society, the parolee shall be returned to the custody of the Division of Correction or the
local correctional facility from which the incarcerated individual was released.
(2) (i) A parole hearing for a parolee returned to custody shall be held
to consider whether the parolee remains incapacitated and shall be heard promptly.
(ii) A parolee returned to custody under this subsection shall be
maintained in custody, if the incapacitation is found to no longer exist.
(3) An incarcerated individual whose medical parole is revoked for lack of
continued incapacitation may be considered for parole in accordance with the eligibility
requirements specified in § 7–301 of this subtitle A PAROLEE SHALL BE RETURNED TO
THE CUSTODY OF THE DIVISION OF CORRECTION OR THE LOCAL CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY FROM WHICH THE PAROLEE WAS RELEASED IF A LICENSED PHYSICIAN HAS
DETERMINED THAT THE PAROLEE:
(1) (I) IS NO LONGER CHRONICALLY DEBILITATED OR
INCAPACITATED; OR
(II) NO LONGER SUFFERS FROM A TERMINAL ILLNESS; AND
(2) (I) NO LONGER REQUIRES EXTENDED MEDICAL MANAGEMENT
WITH HEALTH CARE NEEDS THAT WOULD BE BETTER MET BY COMMUNITY SERVICES;
AND
(II) 1. IS NO LONGER PHYSICALLY INCAPABLE OF
PRESENTING A DANGER TO SOCIETY BY A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION,
DISEASE, OR SYNDROME; OR
2. IS A DANGER TO SOCIETY.
[(h)] (J) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “IMMINENT DEATH” MEANS DEATH
THAT IS LIKELY TO OCCUR WITHIN 6 MONTHS.
(2) Subject to paragraph [(2)] (3) of this subsection, provisions of law
relating to victim notification and opportunity to be heard shall apply to proceedings
relating to medical parole.
– 11 –

Ch. 103 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(2)] (3) In cases of imminent death, time limits relating to victim
notification and opportunity to be heard may be reduced or waived in the discretion of the
Commission.
[(i) (1) If the Commission decides to grant medical parole to an incarcerated
individual sentenced to life imprisonment, the decision shall be transmitted to the
Governor.
(2) The Governor may disapprove the decision by written transmittal to
the Commission.
(3) If the Governor does not disapprove the decision within 180 days after
receipt of the written transmittal, the decision becomes effective.]
[(j)] (K) The Commission shall [issue] ADOPT regulations to implement the
provisions of this section.
7–310.
(A) ON AN ONGOING BASIS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
COMMISSION THE NAMES OF EACH INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) IS AT LEAST 60 YEARS OLD;
(2) HAS BEEN INCARCERATED FOR A CONTINUOUS PERIOD OF AT
LEAST 20 YEARS;
(3) HAS HAD NO MAJOR DISCIPLINARY INFRACTIONS WITHIN THE
PREVIOUS 3–YEAR PERIOD; AND
(4) IS NOT SERVING A SENTENCE OF LIFE WITHOUT THE POSSIBILITY
OF PAROLE.
(B) WITHIN 60 DAYS OF RECEIPT OF A NAME OF AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL
CONDUCT A RISK ASSESSMENT FOR THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL.
(C) ON COMPLETION OF THE RISK ASSESSMENT, THE COMMISSION SHALL
CONDUCT A PAROLE RELEASE HEARING UNDER § 7–306 OR § 7–307 OF THIS
SUBTITLE AND DETERMINE WHETHER THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS SUITABLE
FOR PAROLE.
7–801.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 103
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Victim” has the meaning stated in § 11–104 of the Criminal Procedure
Article.
(3) “Victim’s representative” has the meaning stated in § 11–104 of the
Criminal Procedure Article.
(b) (1) At least 90 days before an incarcerated individual’s parole release
hearing, the Department shall notify the victim or the victim’s representative in writing,
directed to the most current address on file, that the parole release hearing has been
scheduled if:
(i) the victim or the victim’s representative filed a notification
request form under § 11–104 of the Criminal Procedure Article; or
(ii) the victim makes a written request to the Department for
notification and maintains a current address on file with the Department.
(2) The victim may designate in writing to the Department the name and
address of a representative who is a resident of the State to receive notice for the victim.
(c) (1) Not later than 30 days after the date of the Department’s notice under
subsection (b) of this section, the victim of a crime may submit to the Department a written
request that the Division of Parole and Probation be required to complete an updated victim
impact statement.
(2) If the victim submits a request as authorized by paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Department shall direct the Division of Parole and Probation to:
(i) complete the updated statement at least 30 days before the
parole release hearing; and
(ii) send promptly the updated victim impact statement to the
Commission.
(d) A victim may:
(1) at least 30 days before the parole release hearing:
(i) make a written recommendation to the Commission on the
advisability of releasing the incarcerated individual on parole; and
(ii) request that the incarcerated individual be prohibited from
having any contact with the victim as a condition of parole, mandatory supervision, work
release, or other administrative release; and
– 13 –

Ch. 103 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) request a meeting with a commissioner.
(e) The Commission shall make an updated victim impact statement and a
victim’s written recommendation available for review by the incarcerated individual or the
incarcerated individual’s representative under § 7–303(b) of this title.
(f) The Commission shall consider an updated victim impact statement or
victim’s written recommendation at the parole release hearing.
(g) If a victim requested an open hearing under § 7–304 of this title, the victim
may present oral testimony at the incarcerated individual’s parole release hearing in a
manner established in regulations adopted by the Commission.
(h) The Department shall notify promptly the victim or the victim’s
representative of the decision of the Commission regarding parole for the incarcerated
individual.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) IS AT LEAST 65 YEARS OLD;
(2) HAS SERVED AT LEAST 20 YEARS OF INCARCERATION;
(3) IS NOT A SEX OFFENDER, AS DEFINED IN § 11–701 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE;
(4) IS SERVING A TERM OF CONFINEMENT FOR WHICH ALL SENTENCES
BEING SERVED, INCLUDING ANY LIFE SENTENCE, ARE WITH THE POSSIBILITY OF
PAROLE; AND
(5) HAS HAD NO CATEGORY 1A DISCIPLINARY INFRACTIONS WITHIN
THE PREVIOUS 3–YEAR PERIOD.
(B) ON AN ONGOING BASIS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
COMMISSION THE NAME OF EACH INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS THE
QUALIFICATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A NAME UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL ORDER A RISK ASSESSMENT FOR THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS SERVING SENTENCES FOR
MULTIPLE CRIMES OF VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE, WITH AN AGGREGATE TERM OF CONFINEMENT OF 40 YEARS OR MORE.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 103
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY ORDER A RISK ASSESSMENT FOR ANY
OTHER INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL ELIGIBLE FOR PAROLE UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONDUCT A PAROLE RELEASE HEARING
UNDER § 7–306 OR § 7–307 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR EACH INDIVIDUAL WHOSE NAME
IS SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND DETERMINE WHETHER
THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS SUITABLE FOR PAROLE.
(2) THE HEARING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED:
(I) AS SOON AS POSSIBLE, IF NO RISK ASSESSMENT IS
ORDERED; OR
(II) ON COMPLETION OF ANY RISK ASSESSMENT ORDERED.
(E) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN DENIED PAROLE UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT HAVE A SUBSEQUENT PAROLE HEARING FOR 5 YEARS.
(2) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN DENIED PAROLE
UNDER THIS SECTION MAY HAVE A SUBSEQUENT PAROLE HEARING AT ANY TIME IF
THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT EXTRAORDINARY AND COMPELLING
CIRCUMSTANCES JUSTIFY THE SUBSEQUENT PAROLE HEARING.
(F) IN ADDITION TO THE FACTORS SPECIFIED UNDER § 7–305 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, EACH COMMISSION PANEL DETERMINING WHETHER AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL IS SUITABLE FOR PAROLE SHALL CONSIDER AND GIVE WEIGHT TO THE
AGE OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AND THE IMPACT THAT THE AGE OF THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL HAS ON THE RISK THAT THE INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL WILL RECIDIVATE.
(G) ANY SAVINGS REALIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT AS A RESULT OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE USED FOR THE PURPOSE OF:
(1) CONDUCTING RISK ASSESSMENTS FOR INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS;
(2) CONDUCTING PAROLE HEARINGS FOR INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS; AND
(3) PROVIDING PRERELEASE AND REENTRY CASE MANAGEMENT AND
RESOURCES FOR INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE RELEASED ON PAROLE.
– 15 –

Ch. 103 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(H) EVERY YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE JUSTICE
REINVESTMENT OVERSIGHT BOARD ON THE OUTCOMES OF PAROLE
CONSIDERATIONS MADE UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NUMBER OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE SUBJECT
TO THIS SECTION WHO ARE DENIED PAROLE AND RELEASED ON PAROLE;
(2) THE REASON FOR EACH DECISION TO RELEASE AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL ON PAROLE;
(3) THE REASON FOR EACH DECISION TO DENY PAROLE TO AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL;
(4) OF THE NUMBER OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
RELEASED ON PAROLE, THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE CONVICTED OF AN
OFFENSE COMMITTED AFTER RELEASE;
(5) THE AVERAGE TIME BETWEEN WHEN AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL BECOMES ELIGIBLE FOR PAROLE CONSIDERATION UNDER THIS SECTION
AND WHEN THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL RECEIVES THE FIRST PAROLE HEARING
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION; AND
(6) THE AVERAGE TIME BETWEEN PAROLE HEARINGS FOR
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION.
(I) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGULATIONS REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE A REQUIREMENT THAT THE DEPARTMENT PROVIDE ANY INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION WITH INFORMATION ON THE REGULATIONS
AT LEAST ONCE EVERY YEAR.
Article – Criminal Law
14–101.
[(f) (1) This subsection does not apply to a person registered or eligible for
registration under Title 11, Subtitle 7 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(2) A person sentenced under this section may petition for and be granted
parole if the person:
(i) is at least 60 years old; and
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 103
(ii) has served at least 15 years of the sentence imposed under this
section.
(3) The Maryland Parole Commission shall adopt regulations to implement
this subsection.]
Article – State Government
9–3201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Justice Reinvestment Oversight Board.
(c) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of
Crime Prevention and Policy.
(d) “Fund” means the Performance Incentive Grant Fund established in § 9–3209
of this subtitle.
9–3207.
(b) (1) In collaboration with the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services, the Board shall determine the annual savings from the implementation of the
recommendations of the Justice Reinvestment Coordinating Council based on the
difference between the prison population as measured on October 1, 2017, the baseline day,
and the prison population as measured on October 1, 2018, the comparison day, and the
variable cost of incarceration.
(2) If the prison population on the comparison day is less than the prison
population on the baseline day, the Board shall determine a savings based on the difference
in the prison population multiplied by the variable cost.
(3) The Board annually shall determine the difference between the prison
population on October 1, 2017, and the prison population on October 1 of the current year
and calculate any savings in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(4) If a prison population decline causes a correctional unit, wing, or facility
to close, the Board shall conduct an assessment to determine the savings from the closure
and distribute the savings, realized annually, according to the schedule in paragraph (5) of
this subsection.
(5) The Board annually shall recommend that the savings identified in
paragraphs (2) through (4) of this subsection be distributed as follows:
– 17 –

Ch. 103 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) up to 50% of the savings shall be placed in the Performance
Incentive Grant Fund for purposes established under § 9–3209(b)(1) of this subtitle; and
(ii) subject to paragraph (6) of this subsection, the remaining savings
shall be used for additional services identified as reinvestment priorities in the Justice
Reinvestment Coordinating Council’s Final Report.
(6) The Board may recommend that a portion of the remaining savings
identified under paragraph (5)(ii) of this subsection be:
(i) used for the development and implementation of a
post–secondary education and workforce training program for each correctional institution
in the Division of Correction that provides incarcerated individuals with the requisite
training, certifications, and experience to obtain careers in in–demand job sectors; [or]
(ii) for fiscal year 2025 only, distributed to the Office of the
Correctional Ombudsman; OR
(III) DISTRIBUTED TO THE MARYLAND PAROLE COMMISSION
FOR THE PURPOSE OF HIRING PSYCHOLOGISTS TO PERFORM RISK ASSESSMENTS OF
CANDIDATES FOR ELDER GERIATRIC PAROLE UNDER § 7–310 OF THE
CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Parole
Commission shall make efforts to prioritize conducting parole hearings and issuing
recommendations for individuals who are eligible for parole under:
(1) § 7–309 of the Correctional Services Article, as enacted by Section 1 of
this Act; and
(2) § 7–310 of the Correctional Services Article, as enacted by Section 1 of
this Act.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 18 –